Idaho, session 2025, H0062.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 56-227, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-227. FRAUDULENT ACTS -- PENALTY. (1) Whoever knowingly obtains, or
attempts to obtain, or aids or abets any person in obtaining, by means of a
willfully false statement or representation, material omission, or fraudu-
lent devices, public assistance to which he is not entitled, or in an amount
greater than that to which he is justly entitled, shall be punished in the
same manner and to the same extent as for larceny or theft of the money or
value of the public assistance so obtained or attempted to be so obtained.
(2) Whoever sells, conveys, mortgages or otherwise disposes of his
property, real or personal, or conceals his income or resources, for the
purpose of rendering him eligible for public assistance, theretofore or
thereafter applied for, to which he would not otherwise be entitled, shall
be punished in the same manner and to the same extent as for larceny or theft
of the money or value of the public assistance so obtained or so attempted to
be obtained. Provided however, this provision shall not be construed to be
more restrictive than federal or state provisions regarding the transfer of
property for public assistance.
(3) Every person who knowingly aids or abets any person in selling, con-
veying, mortgaging or otherwise disposing of his property, real or personal,
or in concealing his income or resources for the purpose of rendering him el-
igible for public assistance, theretofore or thereafter applied for and re-
ceived, to which he would not otherwise be entitled, shall be punished in the
same manner and to the same extent as for larceny or theft of the money or
value of the public assistance so obtained or attempted to be obtained. Pro-
vided however, this provision shall not apply to any person who communicates
information or renders advice to another regarding federal or state provi-
sions regarding the transfer of property for public assistance.
(4) For the purpose of this section, public assistance shall include
the specific categories of assistance for which provision is made in any fed-
eral or state law existing or hereafter enacted by the congress of the United
States or the state of Idaho by which payments are made from the federal gov-
ernment to the state in aid or in respect to payment by the state for welfare
purposes to any category of needy person and any other program of assistance


for which provision for federal or state funds for aid may from time to time
be made.
(5) The state department of health and welfare shall establish and op-
erate a fraud control program to investigate suspected fraud relating to ap-
plications for public assistance benefits, and public assistance benefits
received by individuals or entities. Such activities shall be those which
that do not fall under the authority of the medicaid fraud control unit as
provided in section 56-226, Idaho Code. The department shall establish a
procedure to coordinate information with prosecuting attorneys to prosecute
offenders who commit fraudulent acts pursuant to this chapter.
(6) The state tax commission and the state department of health and wel-
fare may enter into a written agreement for exchange of an individual's state
income tax return records and information for the purposes of investigating
suspected fraud relating to applications for public assistance benefits and
public assistance benefits received by individuals or entities. Such infor-
mation shall be confidential to the recipient and may be used by the state de-
partment of health and welfare only for purposes of determining whether any
individual or entity has committed a violation of this section. No informa-
tion shared with the state department of health and welfare pursuant to this
section shall be made public unless it is used in the course of a judicial
proceeding arising under the laws of this state. Any information disclosed
pursuant to this section must be disclosed in compliance with the provisions
of 5 U.S.C. 552a and any other applicable federal or state laws or regula-
tions regarding public assistance programs.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.